Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5619.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that ensuring Washington residents have access to high quality postsecondary degrees and credentials is imperative to the success and opportunity of those individuals in the state's diverse and growing economy. Further, the legislature finds that the foremost role of Washington's public higher education institutions has been from inception, and continues to be, to provide access to qualified Washington residents to such education. It is therefore the intent of this act to guarantee that Washington institutions of higher education prioritize Washington resident students for enrollment in postsecondary education programs.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW to read as follows:(1) The fall freshman head count enrollment at each of the state universities, regional universities, the state college, and separately, their respective university campuses must annually equal at least 75 percent Washington resident students. If insufficient academically qualified resident undergraduate applicants apply, an institution may enroll additional nonresident applicants such that the resident student enrollment mix is less than 75 percent.(2) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section:(a) "Academically qualified" means the applicant meets the institution's published minimum admissions standards.(b) "Resident student" has the same meaning as in RCW 28B.15.012.(c) "University campuses" are those provided in chapter 28B.45 RCW.--- END ---